Yamls/N-bab_gt-norm.yaml
Tests:
# The were proofread for golden standard by Larisa Ponomareva 2019-10-09
  
  Noun - баб: # Nouns in the consonants: б, г, ж, к, м, п, р, ф, х, ц, ч, щ, ш - inanimate noun, full paradigm 'grandma / mummo / бабушка'
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Nom: баб
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Acc: бабӧс
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Gen: баблӧн
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Abl: баблісь
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Dat: баблӧ
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Ins: бабӧн
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Com: бабкӧт
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Car: бабтӧг
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Cns: бабла
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Cmpr: бабся
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Ine: бабын
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Ela: бабись
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Ill: бабӧ
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Apr: баблань
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Egr: бабсянь
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Prl: бабӧт
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+TerI: бабӧдз
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+TerII: бабви
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+AprIne: бабланьын
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+AprEla: бабланись
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+AprIll: бабланьӧ
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+AprEgr: бабланьсянь
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+AprPrl: бабланьӧт
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+AprTerI: бабланьӧдз
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+AprTerII: бабланьви
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: бабӧ
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: бабӧлӧн
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: бабӧлісь
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: бабӧлӧ
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: бабӧс
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Ins+PxSg1: бабнам
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Com+PxSg1: бабӧкӧт
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Car+PxSg1: [бабӧтӧг, бабтӧгьям]
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Cns+PxSg1: бабӧла
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Cmpr+PxSg1: бабӧся
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Ine+PxSg1: бабам
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Ela+PxSg1: бабсим
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Ill+PxSg1: бабам
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Apr+PxSg1: [бабӧлань, бабланям]
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Egr+PxSg1: [бабӧсянь, бабсяням]
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Prl+PxSg1: [бабӧттям, бабӧттим]
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+TerI+PxSg1: [бабӧдззам, бабӧдззим]
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+TerII+PxSg1: бабӧви
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+AprIne+PxSg1: бабланям
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+AprEla+PxSg1: бабланьсим
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+AprIll+PxSg1: бабланям
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+AprEgr+PxSg1: [бабланьсяням, бабӧланьсянь]
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+AprPrl+PxSg1: [бабланьӧттям, бабланьӧттим, бабӧланьӧт]
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+AprTerI+PxSg1: [бабланьӧдззам, бабланьӧдззим, бабӧланьӧдз]
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+AprTerII+PxSg1: бабӧланьви
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: бабыт
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: бабытлӧн
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: бабытлісь
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: бабытлӧ
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: бабтӧ
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Ins+PxSg2: бабнат
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Com+PxSg2: бабыткӧт
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Car+PxSg2: [бабыттӧг, бабтӧгьят]
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Cns+PxSg2: бабытла
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Cmpr+PxSg2: бабытся
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Ine+PxSg2: бабат
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Ela+PxSg2: бабсит
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Ill+PxSg2: бабат
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Apr+PxSg2: [бабытлань, бабланят]
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Egr+PxSg2: [бабытсянь, бабсянят]
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Prl+PxSg2: [бабӧттят, бабӧттит]
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+TerI+PxSg2: [бабӧдззат, бабӧдззит]
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+TerII+PxSg2: бабытви
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+AprIne+PxSg2: бабланят
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+AprEla+PxSg2: бабланьсит
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+AprIll+PxSg2: бабланят
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+AprEgr+PxSg2: [бабланьсянят, бабытланьсянь]
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+AprPrl+PxSg2: [бабланьӧттят, бабланьӧттит, бабытланьӧт]
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+AprTerI+PxSg2: [бабланьӧдззат, бабланьӧдззит, бабытланьӧдз]
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+AprTerII+PxSg2: бабытланьви
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: бабыс
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: бабыслӧн
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: бабыслісь
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: бабыслӧ
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: бабсӧ
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Ins+PxSg3: бабнас
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Com+PxSg3: бабыскӧт
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Car+PxSg3: [бабыстӧг, бабтӧгьяс]
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Cns+PxSg3: бабысла
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Cmpr+PxSg3: бабысся
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Ine+PxSg3: бабас
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Ela+PxSg3: бабсис
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Ill+PxSg3: бабас
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Apr+PxSg3: [бабыслань, бабланяс]
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Egr+PxSg3: [бабыссянь, бабсяняс]
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Prl+PxSg3: [бабӧттяс, бабӧттис]
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+TerI+PxSg3: [бабӧдззас, бабӧдззис]
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+TerII+PxSg3: бабысви
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+AprIne+PxSg3: бабланяс
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+AprEla+PxSg3: бабланьсис
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+AprIll+PxSg3: бабланяс
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+AprEgr+PxSg3: [бабланьсяняс, бабысланьсянь]
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+AprPrl+PxSg3: [бабланьӧттяc, бабланьӧттиc, бабысланьӧт]
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+AprTerI+PxSg3: [бабланьӧдззаc, бабланьӧдззиc, бабысланьӧдз]
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+AprTerII+PxSg3: бабысланьви
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: бабным
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: бабнымлӧн
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: бабнымлісь
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: бабнымлӧ
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: бабнымӧс
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Ins+PxPl1: бабнаным
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Com+PxPl1: бабнымкӧт
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Car+PxPl1: [бабнымтӧг, бабтӧгьяным]
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Cns+PxPl1: бабнымла
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Cmpr+PxPl1: бабнымся
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Ine+PxPl1: бабаным
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Ela+PxPl1: бабсиным
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: бабаным
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Apr+PxPl1: [бабнымлань, бабланяным]
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Egr+PxPl1: [бабнымсянь, бабсяняным]
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Prl+PxPl1: [бабӧттяным, бабӧттиным]
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+TerI+PxPl1: [бабӧдззаным, бабӧдззиным]
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+TerII+PxPl1: бабнымви
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+AprIne+PxPl1: бабланяным
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+AprEla+PxPl1: бабланьсиным
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+AprIll+PxPl1: бабланяным
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+AprEgr+PxPl1: [бабланьсяняным, бабнымланьсянь]
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+AprPrl+PxPl1: [бабланьӧттяным, бабланьӧттиным, бабнымланьӧт]
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+AprTerI+PxPl1: [бабланьӧдззаным, бабланьӧдззиным,  бабнымланьӧдз]
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+AprTerII+PxPl1: бабнымланьви
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: бабныт
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: бабнытлӧн
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: бабнытлісь
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: бабнытлӧ
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: бабнытӧ
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Ins+PxPl2: бабнаныт
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Com+PxPl2: бабныткӧт
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Car+PxPl2: [бабныттӧг, бабтӧгьяныт]
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Cns+PxPl2: бабнытла
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Cmpr+PxPl2: бабнытся
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Ine+PxPl2: бабаныт
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Ela+PxPl2: бабсиныт
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Ill+PxPl2: бабаныт
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Apr+PxPl2: [бабнытлань, бабланяныт]
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Egr+PxPl2: [бабнытсянь, бабсяняныт]
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Prl+PxPl2: [бабӧттяныт, бабӧттиныт]
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+TerI+PxPl2: [бабӧдззаныт, бабӧдззиныт]
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+TerII+PxPl2: бабнытви
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+AprIne+PxPl2: бабланяныт
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+AprEla+PxPl2: бабланьсиныт
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+AprIll+PxPl2: бабланяныт
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+AprEgr+PxPl2: [бабланьсяняныт, бабнытланьсянь]
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+AprPrl+PxPl2: [бабланьӧттяныт, бабланьӧттиныт, бабнытланьӧт]
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+AprTerI+PxPl2: [бабланьӧдззаныт, бабланьӧдззиныт, бабнытланьӧдз]
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+AprTerII+PxPl2: бабнытланьви
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: бабныс
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: бабныслӧн
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: бабныслісь
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: бабныслӧ
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: бабнысӧ
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Ins+PxPl3: бабнаныс
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Com+PxPl3: бабныскӧт
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Car+PxPl3: [бабныстӧг, бабтӧгьяныс]
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Cns+PxPl3: бабнысла
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Cmpr+PxPl3: бабнысся
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Ine+PxPl3: бабаныс
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Ela+PxPl3: бабсиныс
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Ill+PxPl3: бабаныс
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Apr+PxPl3: [бабныслань, бабланяныс]
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Egr+PxPl3: [бабныссянь, бабсяняныс]
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+Prl+PxPl3: [бабӧттяныс, бабӧттиныс]
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+TerI+PxPl3: [бабӧдззаныс, бабӧдззиныс]
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+TerII+PxPl3: бабнысви
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+AprIne+PxPl3: бабланяныс
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+AprEla+PxPl3: бабланьсиныс
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+AprIll+PxPl3: бабланяныс
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+AprEgr+PxPl3: [бабланьсяняныс, бабнысланьсянь]
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+AprPrl+PxPl3: [бабланьӧттяныс, бабланьӧттиныс, бабнысланьӧт]
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+AprTerI+PxPl3: [бабланьӧдззаныс, бабланьӧдззиныс, бабнысланьӧдз]
     баб+N+Anim+Sg+AprTerII+PxPl3: бабнысланьви
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Nom: баббез
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Acc: баббезӧс
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Gen: баббезлӧн
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Abl: баббезлісь
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Dat: баббезлӧ
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Ins: баббезӧн
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Com: баббезкӧт
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Car: баббезтӧг
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Cns: баббезла
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Cmpr: баббезся
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Ine: баббезын
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Ela: баббезісь
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Ill: баббезӧ
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Apr: баббезлань
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Egr: баббезсянь
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Prl: баббезӧт
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+TerI: баббезӧдз
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+TerII: баббезви
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+AprIne: баббезланьын
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+AprEla: баббезланись
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+AprIll: баббезланьӧ
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+AprEgr: баббезланьсянь
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+AprPrl: баббезланьӧт
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+AprTerI: баббезланьӧдз
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+AprTerII: баббезланьви
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: баббезӧ
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: баббезӧлӧн
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: баббезӧлісь
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: баббезӧлӧ
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: баббезӧс
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Ins+PxSg1: баббезнам
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Com+PxSg1: баббезӧкӧт
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Car+PxSg1: [баббезӧтӧг, баббезтӧгьям]
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Cns+PxSg1: баббезӧла
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Cmpr+PxSg1: баббезӧся
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Ine+PxSg1: баббезам
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Ela+PxSg1: [баббезсим, баббесим]
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Ill+PxSg1: баббезам
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Apr+PxSg1: [баббезӧлань, баббезланям]
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Egr+PxSg1: [баббезӧсянь, баббезсяням]
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Prl+PxSg1: [баббезӧттям, баббезӧттим]
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+TerI+PxSg1: [баббезӧдззам, баббезӧдззим]
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+TerII+PxSg1: баббезӧви
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+AprIne+PxSg1: баббезланям
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+AprEla+PxSg1: баббезланьсим
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+AprIll+PxSg1: баббезланям
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+AprEgr+PxSg1: [баббезланьсяням, баббезӧланьсянь]
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+AprPrl+PxSg1: [баббезланьӧттям, баббезланьӧттим, баббезӧланьӧт]
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+AprTerI+PxSg1: [баббезланьӧдззам, баббезланьӧдззим, баббезӧланьӧдз]
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+AprTerII+PxSg1: баббезӧланьви
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: [баббет, баббезыт]
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: [баббетлӧн, баббезытлӧн]
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: [баббетлісь, баббезытлісь]
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: [баббетлӧ, баббезытлӧ]
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: [баббетӧ, баббезтӧ]
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Ins+PxSg2: баббезнат
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Com+PxSg2: [баббеткӧт, баббезыткӧт]
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Car+PxSg2: [баббеттӧг, баббезыттӧг, баббезтӧгьят]
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Cns+PxSg2: [баббетла, баббезытла]
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Cmpr+PxSg2: [баббется, баббезытся]
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Ine+PxSg2: баббезат
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Ela+PxSg2: [баббезсит, баббесит]
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: баббезат
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Apr+PxSg2: [баббетлань, баббезытлань, баббезланят]
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Egr+PxSg2: [баббетсянь, баббезытсянь, баббезсянят]
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Prl+PxSg2: [баббезӧттят, баббезӧттит]
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+TerI+PxSg2: [баббезӧдззат, баббезӧдззит]
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+TerII+PxSg2: [баббетви, баббезытви]
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+AprIne+PxSg2: баббезланят
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+AprEla+PxSg2: баббезланьсит
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+AprIll+PxSg2: баббезланят
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+AprEgr+PxSg2: [баббезланьсянят, баббетланьсянь, баббезытланьсянь]
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+AprPrl+PxSg2: [баббезланьӧттят, баббезланьӧттит, баббетланьӧт, баббезытланьӧт]
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+AprTerI+PxSg2: [баббезланьӧдззат, баббезланьӧдззит, баббетланьӧдз, баббезытланьӧдз]
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+AprTerII+PxSg2: [баббетланьви, баббезытланьви]
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: [баббес, баббезыс]
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: [баббеслӧн, баббезыслӧн]
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: [баббеслісь, баббезыслісь]
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: [баббеслӧ, баббезыслӧ]
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: [баббесӧ, баббезсӧ]
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Ins+PxSg3: баббезнас
